District of Columbia statutes.
31-1808

Duties of reinsurers utilizing the services of a reinsurance-intermediary-manager.

(a)

A reinsurer shall not engage the services of any person, firm, association, or corporation to act as a reinsurance manager on its behalf unless the person is licensed as required by § 31-1802(b).

(b)

The reinsurer shall annually obtain a copy of statements of the financial condition of each reinsurance manager which the reinsurer has engaged prepared by an independent certified accountant in a form acceptable to the Mayor.

(c)

If a reinsurance manager establishes loss reserves, the reinsurer shall annually obtain the opinion of an actuary attesting to the adequacy of loss reserves established for losses incurred and outstanding on business produced by the reinsurance manager. This opinion shall be in addition to any other required loss reserve certification.

(d)

Binding authority for all retrocessional contracts or participation in reinsurance syndicates shall rest with an officer of the reinsurer who shall not be affiliated with the reinsurance manager.

(e)

Within 30 days of termination of a contract with a reinsurance manager, the reinsurer shall provide written notification of the termination to the Commissioner.

(f)

A reinsurer shall not appoint to its board of directors, any officer, director, employee, controlling shareholder, or subproducer of its reinsurance manager. This subsection shall not apply to relationships governed by Chapter 7 of this title.

History

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-47, § 9, 40 DCR 6093
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(bb), 44 DCR 1730

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-1806.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-3108.